Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 25. Quartermaster General

§ 481.
Duties generally.

The Adjutant and Inspector General shall keep in good repair, and attend to the preservation, safekeeping, and cleaning of the ordnance, arms, accoutrements, ammunition, munitions of war, and implements of every description, whether the property of the State or issued to the State by the federal government, and shall have the control and disposition of it for that purpose, subject to the orders of the Governor.

The Adjutant and Inspector General shall make provisions for the care and preservation of the buildings and grounds used in connection with the National Guard.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 17.

§ 482.
Repealed. 2021, No. 10, § 18.

§ 483.
Instructions to commanding officers.

The Adjutant and Inspector General shall give instructions to the commanding officers of the separate units of the National Guard as necessary for the discharge of the duties of the unit and the Military Department under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 318;

2021, No. 10

, § 19.

§§ 484,
485.
Repealed.
1963, No. 39, § 5, eff. April 11, 1963.

§ 486.
Provision for pay.

The Adjutant and Inspector General shall provide for the pay of each officer and enlisted Guard member for duty performed and authorized in accordance with chapters 21-39 of this title. The Adjutant and Inspector General shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 118;

2021, No. 10

, § 20.

§ 487.
Repealed. 2009, No. 33, § 83(i)(2).